Maryland, session 2026, HB1411.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
TITLE 19. DATA CENTERS.
19–101.
(A) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “DATA CENTER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 11–239 OF THE TAX –
GENERAL ARTICLE.
(C) “DISCLOSURE REPORT” MEANS THE DISCLOSURE REPORT THAT AN
OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A PROPOSED, PLANNED, OR APPROVED LARGE–SCALE
DATA CENTER IS REQUIRED TO PROVIDE UNDER § 19–102 OF THIS TITLE.
(D) “LARGE–SCALE DATA CENTER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
4–217 OF THE LAND USE ARTICLE.

HOUSE BILL 1411 3
(E) “MULTITENANT DATA CENTER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 4–217
OF THE LAND USE ARTICLE.
19–102.
(A) (1) AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A PROPOSED, PLANNED, OR
APPROVED LARGE–SCALE DATA CENTER SHALL SUBMIT A DISCLOSURE REPORT TO:
(I) THE DEPARTMENT;
(II) THE MARYLAND ENERGY ADMINISTRATION;
(III) THE LOCAL APPROVING AUTHORITIES FOR PLANNING,
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT, PERMITTING, AND ENVIRONMENT, AS APPLICABLE, OF
THE LOCAL JURISDICTION IN WHICH THE DATA CENTER WILL BE LOCATED; AND
(IV) ANY STATE AND LOCAL ELECTED OFFICIAL REPRESENTING
THE AREA IN WHICH THE DATA CENTER WILL BE LOCATED.
(2) A DISCLOSURE REPORT SHALL BE SUBMITTED TO THE ENTITIES
LISTED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION BY THE EARLIER OF THE
FOLLOWING:
(I) 60 DAYS BEFORE THE OWNER OR OPERATOR SUBMITS AN
APPLICATION FOR ANY GRANT, LOAN, OR OTHER FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE OR
INCENTIVE, INCLUDING A TAX INCENTIVE, TO A UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT; OR
(II) 60 DAYS BEFORE THE OWNER OR OPERATOR SUBMITS AN
APPLICATION FOR ANY PERMIT, APPROVAL, OR LICENSE REQUIRED BY FEDERAL,
STATE, OR LOCAL LAW TO CONSTRUCT OR OPERATE A LARGE–SCALE DATA CENTER.
(B) A DISCLOSURE REPORT SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) THE NAME AND ADDRESS OF:
(I) THE FACILITY;
(II) THE OPERATOR OF THE FACILITY; AND
(III) THE OWNER OF THE LAND, BUILDING, AND COMPUTER
EQUIPMENT ASSOCIATED WITH THE FACILITY;
(2) A DETAILED DESCRIPTION FOR:

HOUSE BILL 1411
(I) DEMONSTRATING THE NEED FOR THE FACILITY;
(II) EXPLAINING THE REASONING FOR THE LOCATION OF THE
FACILITY; AND
(III) OUTLINING THE COMMUNITY BENEFITS THAT WILL BE
PROVIDED BY THE FACILITY;
(3) INFORMATION ON WHETHER:
(I) THE OWNER OR OPERATOR HAS SIGNED AN
INTERCONNECTION AGREEMENT, AND IF SO:
1. THE STATUS OF THE FACILITY’S INTERCONNECTION
TO A UTILITY SYSTEM OR TRANSMISSION GRID; AND
2. WHETHER A LOAD STUDY HAS ALREADY BEEN
CONDUCTED;
(II) THE FACILITY HAS BEEN PREVIOUSLY PROPOSED AT
ANOTHER LOCATION IN THE STATE OR IN ANOTHER STATE; AND
(III) THE FACILITY IS A MULTITENANT DATA CENTER;
(4) THE TOTAL SQUARE FOOTAGE OF THE FACILITY;
(5) THE MEAN AMOUNT OF PROJECTED DAILY ELECTRICITY USAGE
MEASURED IN MEGAWATTS;
(6) THE MEAN AMOUNT OF PROJECTED ELECTRICITY USAGE PER
HOUR DURING PEAK LOAD MEASURED IN MEGAWATTS AND FREQUENCY OF PEAK
LOAD PER WEEK;
(7) THE SOURCE OF POWER FOR THE FACILITY, INCLUDING A COPY
OF ANY POWER PURCHASE AGREEMENT FOR SUPPLYING ELECTRICITY TO THE
FACILITY WITH AN ESTIMATE ON THE LEVEL OF GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS
ASSOCIATED WITH THE PROJECTED ELECTRICITY USAGE;
(8) ANY ANTICIPATED NEED FOR ADDITIONAL POWER
INFRASTRUCTURE, INCLUDING TRANSMISSION LINES AND SUBSTATIONS;

HOUSE BILL 1411 5
(9) THE NUMBER, SIZE, FUEL SOURCE, AND PROJECTED EMISSIONS
OF ANY BACKUP GENERATORS FOR THE FACILITY;
(10) THE TYPE, CAPACITY, AND PROJECTED EMISSIONS OF ANY
ON–SITE GENERATION FOR REGULAR OPERATION;
(11) THE TYPE OF COOLING SYSTEM, SOURCES OF WATER, AND
ESTIMATED VOLUME OF WATER APPROPRIATION NEEDED, IF APPLICABLE;
(12) THE PROJECTED NOISE LEVELS EMITTED BY THE FACILITY
ESTIMATED IN DECIBELS:
(I) 1. AT THE FACILITY PROPERTY LINE; AND
2. AT PROPERTIES LOCATED WITHIN A 0.25–MILE,
0.50–MILE, AND 1.0–MILE RADIUS OF THE FACILITY PROPERTY LINE; AND
(II) FOR WHEN THE FACILITY WILL BE OPERATING ALL
COOLING AND COMPUTER EQUIPMENT AND REGULAR TESTING OF ALL EMERGENCY
GENERATORS AT FULL LOAD;
(13) ESTIMATED MILESTONE DATES FOR DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION;
(14) THE NUMBER AND TYPE OF PERMANENT POSTCONSTRUCTION
JOBS THE FACILITY WILL PROVIDE; AND
(15) ANY STATE, COUNTY, OR LOCAL GRANT, LOAN, OR OTHER
FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE OR INCENTIVE, INCLUDING A TAX INCENTIVE, THE OWNER
OR OPERATOR OF THE FACILITY INTENDS TO APPLY FOR.
(C) IF THERE ARE SUBSTANTIAL CHANGES TO ANY OF THE ITEMS REQUIRED
UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF THE
LARGE–SCALE DATA CENTER SHALL SUBMIT AN AMENDED DISCLOSURE REPORT IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(D) (1) NEITHER THE DISCLOSURE REPORT NOR ANY OF ITS CONTENTS
SHALL BE CONSIDERED PRIVILEGED OR CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION.
(2) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING A DISCLOSURE REPORT, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL PUBLISH THE DISCLOSURE REPORT ON ITS WEBSITE.
Article – Land Use
1–401.

HOUSE BILL 1411
(b) The following provisions of this division apply to a charter county:
(19) § 4–217 (DATA CENTER ZONING);
[(19)] (20) Title 4, Subtitle 5 (Accessory Dwelling Units);
[(20)] (21) § 5–102(d) (Subdivision regulations – Burial sites);
[(21)] (22) § 5–104 (Major subdivision – Review);
[(22)] (23) Title 7, Subtitle 1 (Development Mechanisms);
[(23)] (24) Title 7, Subtitle 2 (Transfer of Development Rights);
[(24)] (25) except in Montgomery County or Prince George’s County, Title
7, Subtitle 3 (Development Rights and Responsibilities Agreements);
[(25)] (26) Title 7, Subtitle 4 (Inclusionary Zoning);
[(26)] (27) Title 7, Subtitle 5 (Housing Expansion and Affordability);
[(27)] (28) § 8–401 (Conversion of overhead facilities);
[(28)] (29) for Baltimore County only, Title 9, Subtitle 3 (Single–County
Provisions – Baltimore County);
[(29)] (30) for Frederick County only, Title 9, Subtitle 10 (Single–County
Provisions – Frederick County);
[(30)] (31) for Howard County only, Title 9, Subtitle 13 (Single–County
Provisions – Howard County);
[(31)] (32) for Talbot County only, Title 9, Subtitle 18 (Single–County
Provisions – Talbot County); and
[(32)] (33) Title 11, Subtitle 2 (Civil Penalty).
4–217.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.

HOUSE BILL 1411 7
(2) “DATA CENTER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 11–239 OF THE
TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(3) (I) “LARGE–SCALE DATA CENTER” MEANS A DATA CENTER
THAT IS PROJECTED TO HAVE AN AGGREGATE MONTHLY DEMAND OF AT LEAST 20
MEGAWATTS.
(II) “LARGE–SCALE DATA CENTER” INCLUDES A MULTITENANT
DATA CENTER THAT IS PROJECTED TO HAVE AN AGGREGATE MONTHLY DEMAND OF
AT LEAST 20 MEGAWATTS.
(4) “MULTITENANT DATA CENTER” MEANS A FACILITY THAT LEASES
SPACE TO MULTIPLE DATA CENTER OPERATORS AND MAY PROVIDE SHARED
SERVICES INCLUDING POWER, COOLING, AND INTERNET CONNECTIVITY.
(5) “PLAN” MEANS THE LARGE–SCALE DATA CENTER PLAN ADOPTED
BY A LOCAL JURISDICTION UNDER THIS SECTION.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A LOCAL JURISDICTION WITH A
POPULATION OF AT LEAST 10,000 RESIDENTS.
(C) (1) ON OR BEFORE JUNE 30, 2027, EACH LOCAL JURISDICTION SHALL
DEVELOP AND ADOPT BY LOCAL LAW A LARGE–SCALE DATA CENTER PLAN IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(2) WITHIN 60 DAYS AFTER ADOPTING THE PLAN, THE LOCAL
JURISDICTION SHALL SUBMIT THE PLAN TO THE DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING.
(D) THE PLAN SHALL:
(1) BE CONSISTENT WITH THE LOCAL JURISDICTION’S SUSTAINABLE
GROWTH PRINCIPLES AND COMPREHENSIVE PLAN;
(2) INCLUDE POLICIES THAT:
(I) PROMOTE SUSTAINABLE DEVELOPMENT AND PROTECT THE
ENVIRONMENT;
(II) MAINTAIN COMMUNITY CHARACTER;
(III) ENSURE A TRANSPARENT AND INCLUSIVE PROCESS;
(IV) MAXIMIZE LOCAL ECONOMIC BENEFITS;

HOUSE BILL 1411
(V) PROTECT COMMUNITY AND PUBLIC HEALTH; AND
(VI) PROTECT UTILITY RATEPAYERS; AND
(3) INCLUDE RECOMMENDATIONS FOR:
(I) SITING GUIDELINES, INCLUDING LOCATIONS WHERE
LARGE–SCALE DATA CENTER DEVELOPMENT MAY BE DESIRABLE AND LOCATIONS
WHERE DEVELOPMENT SHOULD BE RESTRICTED, WITH CONSIDERATION FOR:
1. UNDERSERVED AND OVERBURDENED COMMUNITIES;
2. AREAS CERTIFIED AS A PRIORITY PRESERVATION
AREA UNDER § 2–518 OF THE AGRICULTURE ARTICLE;
3. AREAS DESIGNATED BY THE RURAL LEGACY BOARD
AS A RURAL LEGACY AREA UNDER TITLE 5, SUBTITLE 9A OF THE NATURAL
RESOURCES ARTICLE;
4. AGRICULTURAL LAND;
5. UNDEVELOPED LAND; AND
6. PROXIMITY TO SCHOOLS, DAYCARES, PARKS, OR
MEDICAL FACILITIES;
(II) ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION, WITH CONSIDERATION FOR
CUMULATIVE IMPACTS;
(III) REQUIREMENTS FOR PUBLIC NOTICE THAT PROVIDE AN
OPPORTUNITY FOR PUBLIC INPUT MEETINGS AND ENSURE ONGOING PROJECT
TRANSPARENCY, INCLUDING REQUIRING AT LEAST TWO PUBLIC INPUT MEETINGS
BEFORE ANY LOCAL DEVELOPMENT PLANS OR PERMITS FOR A LARGE–SCALE DATA
CENTER ARE APPROVED;
(IV) REQUIREMENTS FOR COMMUNITY BENEFITS;
(V) CONSIDERATIONS FOR LOCATING ADDITIONAL POWER
SUPPORT INFRASTRUCTURE THAT MAY BE NEEDED, INCLUDING TRANSMISSION
LINES AND SUBSTATIONS;

HOUSE BILL 1411 9
(VI) CONSIDERATIONS FOR DEVELOPMENT RESTRICTIONS,
INCLUDING SIZE LIMITATIONS; AND
(VII) CONSIDERATIONS FOR COUNTY GRANTS, LOANS, AND TAX
CREDITS.
(E) IN DEVELOPING THE PLAN, THE LOCAL JURISDICTION SHALL HOLD AT
LEAST TWO MEETINGS TO SOLICIT PUBLIC INPUT.
(F) A LOCAL JURISDICTION SHALL ADOPT:
(1) ZONING REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THE PLAN, INCLUDING
REGULATIONS GOVERNING WHERE LARGE–SCALE DATA CENTERS WILL BE:
(I) PROHIBITED;
(II) ALLOWED BY SPECIAL EXCEPTION; AND
(III) ALLOWED BY RIGHT, IF APPLICABLE;
(2) ANY ZONING OVERLAYS DEEMED NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT THE
PLAN; AND
(3) ANY OTHER ZONING REQUIREMENT OR RESTRICTION DEEMED
NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT THE PLAN.
(G) THE DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING:
(1) SHALL PUBLISH EACH LARGE–SCALE DATA CENTER PLAN WITHIN
30 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING THE PLAN FROM A LOCAL JURISDICTION; AND
(2) MAY DEVELOP GUIDANCE, MODEL ORDINANCES, AND OTHER
RESOURCES TO ASSIST LOCAL JURISDICTIONS IN PLANNING FOR DATA CENTER
DEVELOPMENT.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
7–240.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.

HOUSE BILL 1411
(2) “DATA CENTER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 11–239 OF THE
TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(3) “LARGE–SCALE DATA CENTER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
4–217 OF THE LAND USE ARTICLE.
(B) AN OFFICER OR A UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT MAY NOT USE ANY PART
OF AN APPROPRIATION TO PROVIDE A GRANT, LOAN, OR OTHER FINANCIAL
ASSISTANCE OR INCENTIVE TO AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A LARGE–SCALE DATA
CENTER UNLESS:
(1) THE OWNER OR OPERATOR IS IN COMPLIANCE WITH § 19–102 OF
THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE; AND
(2) THE LOCAL JURISDICTION IN WHICH THE LARGE–SCALE DATA
CENTER WILL BE LOCATED HAS ADOPTED A LARGE–SCALE DATA CENTER PLAN AND
THE ZONING REGULATIONS NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT THE PLAN, IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 4–217 OF THE LAND USE ARTICLE.
Article – Tax – General
11–239.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Data center” means a building or group of buildings used to house
computer systems, computer storage equipment, and associated infrastructure that
businesses or other organizations use to organize, process, store, and disseminate large
amounts of data.
(3) “Department” means the Department of Commerce.
(c) (1) To qualify for the sales and use tax exemption under subsection (b) of
this section, an individual or a corporation shall file an application for an exemption
certificate with the Department.
(2) (I) The application must:
[(i)] 1. demonstrate that the applicant intends to meet the
requirements of a qualified data center; and
[(ii)] 2. include any information the Department requires to
evidence the capacity and intention of the applicant to fulfill the commitments set forth in
the applicant’s application.

HOUSE BILL 1411 11
(II) IN ADDITION TO THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, FOR A LARGE–SCALE DATA CENTER, AS
DEFINED IN § 4–217 OF THE LAND USE ARTICLE, THE APPLICATION MUST
DEMONSTRATE THAT:
1. THE APPLICANT IS IN COMPLIANCE WITH § 19–102 OF
THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE; AND
2. THE LOCAL JURISDICTION IN WHICH THE
LARGE–SCALE DATA CENTER IS LOCATED HAS ADOPTED A LARGE–SCALE DATA
CENTER PLAN AND THE ZONING REGULATIONS NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT THE
PLAN, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 4–217 OF THE LAND USE ARTICLE.
(3) If, based on the information and supporting documentation provided in
the application, the Department determines the applicant is eligible for the sales and use
tax exemption under subsection (b) of this section, the Department shall certify the
eligibility of the applicant.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.